Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 3. Licensing Electricians

§ 901.
Electricians’ Licensing Board; membership; powers.

Creation. A board for the licensing of electricians is created, to be known as the “Electricians’ Licensing Board.”

Membership. The Board consists of the Commissioner of Public Safety or a member of that Department designated by the Commissioner and four persons appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate.

The four appointed members shall serve for terms of three years, beginning on July 1 in the year of appointment, and they shall include one licensed master electrician, one licensed journeyman electrician, one person associated with the public electrical utility industry who is knowledgeable in technical as well as operational issues of the electrical utility industry, and one person associated with the fire insurance industry.

Not more than two appointed members’ terms shall expire in the same year.

The Governor shall appoint one of the members of the Board to serve as its chair.

Continuing education; sunset review.

Not less than once every five years, the Board shall review electricians’ continuing education or other continuing competency requirements. The review results shall be in writing and address the following:

the renewal requirements for electricians;

the renewal requirements in other jurisdictions, particularly in the Northeast region;

the cost of the renewal requirements for electricians;

an analysis of the utility and effectiveness of the renewal requirements with respect to public protection; and

recommendations to the Commissioner on whether the continuing education or other continuing competency requirements should be modified.

The Commissioner shall respond to the Board within 45 days of its submitted review results. The Commissioner may require the Board to reduce, modify, or otherwise change the renewal requirements, including by proposing any necessary amendments to statute or rule.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 284

(Adj. Sess.), § 3; amended

1971, No. 14

, § 14, eff. March 11, 1971;

1987, No. 274

(Adj. Sess.), § 12;

1993, No. 218

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2005, No. 8

, § 9, eff. April 25, 2005; No. 152 (Adj. Sess.), § 11, eff. April 1, 2021;

2019, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 36, eff. July 1, 2021.

§ 902.
Master electricians.

To be eligible for licensure as a master electrician, an applicant shall:

have been licensed as a journeyman electrician under this chapter for at least two years; or

have had comparable experience and training, within or without this State, acceptable to the Board; and

pass an examination to the satisfaction of the Board.

Upon successful completion of the examination and payment of the required fee, the applicant shall receive a master electrician’s license in the form of a wallet-size card. This license shall be carried by the master electrician at all times while performing his or her trade and shall be displayed upon request. Upon the request by the licensee and upon payment of the required fee, the Board shall issue a license certificate suitable for framing.

A person licensed under this chapter as a master electrician is entitled to design, install, repair, maintain, and replace electrical installations including lightning rods, fire alarms, and fire detection systems as his or her principal business or in the course of another business conducted by him or her, and may employ other persons licensed under this chapter or electrician’s helpers to perform work in connection with electrical installations under his or her direction.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 284

(Adj. Sess.), § 3; amended

1971, No. 42

, § 1, eff. April 7, 1971;

1973, No. 214

(Adj. Sess.), § 25;

1979, No. 121

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

1987, No. 274

(Adj. Sess.), § 13.

§ 903.
Journeyman electricians.

To be eligible for licensure as a journeyman electrician an applicant shall:

provide verification by the Vermont Apprenticeship Council of completion of an apprenticeship in electrical wiring that included both instruction and practice in work processes; or

have had equivalent training and experience, within or outside this State, acceptable to the Board; and

pass an examination to the satisfaction of the Board.

Upon successful completion of the examination and payment of the required fee, the applicant shall receive a journeyman electrician’s license in the form of a wallet-size card. This license shall be carried by the journeyman at all times while performing his or her trade and shall be displayed upon request. Upon request by the licensee and payment of the required fee, the Board shall issue a license certificate suitable for framing.

A person licensed under this chapter as a journeyman electrician is entitled to perform electrical installations under the direction of a master electrician, and may supervise an apprentice electrician or an electrician’s helper employed by a master electrician under the master electrician’s direction.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 284

(Adj. Sess.), § 3; amended

1971, No. 42

, § 2, eff. April 7, 1971;

1979, No. 121

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

1987, No. 274

(Adj. Sess.), § 14;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 274.

§ 904.
Type-S journeyman electrician.

To be eligible for licensure as a type-S journeyman an applicant shall:

complete an accredited training and experience program recognized by the Board; or

have had training and experience, within or without this State, acceptable to the Board; and

pass an examination to the satisfaction of the Board in one or more of the following fields:

automatic gas or oil heating;

outdoor advertising;

refrigeration or air conditioning;

appliance and motor repairs;

well pumps;

farm equipment;

any miscellaneous specified area of specialized competence.

Upon successful completion of the examination and payment of the required fee for each field in which a license is to be issued, the applicant shall receive a license in the form of a wallet-size that which shall be carried at all times while performing his or her trade and shall be displayed upon request. Upon request of the licensee and upon payment of the required fee, the Board shall issue a license certificate suitable for framing.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 284

(Adj. Sess.), § 3; amended

1971, No. 42

, § 3, eff. April 7, 1971;

1979, No. 121

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

1987, No. 274

(Adj. Sess.), § 15.

§ 905.
Application; examinations, education, and fees.

Each applicant for a license shall submit to the Board, on forms furnished by it, a written application containing such relevant information as the Board may require, accompanied by the required examination fee.
(a) (1) Each applicant for a license shall submit to the Board, on forms furnished by it, a written application containing such relevant information as the Board may require, accompanied by the required examination fee.

The examination fee shall be established by the Board but shall be no greater than the cost associated with administering the examination. Notwithstanding

32 V.S.A. § 502(a)

, if the examination is conducted by an outside testing service, the required examination fee may be paid directly to the testing service.

Examinations shall be conducted in writing and shall include a practical skills examination. The examination shall cover theoretical and practical aspects of electrical work, together with pertinent laws and rules. In addition, the master electrician’s examination shall contain questions on the installation of lightning rods, fire alarms, and fire detection systems.

An applicant who fails the examination may, upon payment of the required fee, retake the examination.

Three-year electrical license fees shall be: (A) for a masters license (initial and renewal) $150.00; (B) for a journeyman’s license (initial and renewal) $115.00; (C) for a type-S journeyman’s license (initial and renewal) per field $115.00. (2) The fee for a certificate for framing shall be: $ 10.00.

Click to view

If a license is allowed to lapse, it may be renewed within one year of its expiration date by the payment of $25.00 in addition to the renewal fee.

The fee for replacement of a lost or damaged license shall be: $20.00.

Pursuant to qualifications and procedures determined by the Commissioner, the Board shall, upon request, waive application fees for qualified military members and military spouses.

The education module shall be not more than two hours and shall be required as a condition of initial licensure and license renewal. The module shall include education on any State or utility incentives relevant to the profession.

The education module for initial licensure shall provide general information regarding the State’s energy goals.

The education module for license renewal shall provide any updates on the State’s energy goals and any updates regarding corresponding State energy programs applicable to the profession.

The Commissioner shall consider any recommendations on these education modules provided by relevant stakeholders and approve education modules in consultation with the Agency of Natural Resources and the Department of Public Service.

In addition to other education requirements of this subchapter, the Commissioner shall require each applicant to complete an education module regarding the State’s energy goals and how the electrician profession can further those goals.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 284

(Adj. Sess.), § 3; amended

1979, No. 121

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

1987, No. 274

(Adj. Sess.), § 16;

1991, No. 234

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

1999, No. 49

, §§ 142, 143;

2001, No. 65

, § 3;

2009, No. 134

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. May 29, 2010;

2019, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 12, eff. April 1, 2021;

2019, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 36, eff. July 1, 2021.

§ 906.
Examinations not required.

Generally. A license for an individual who is licensed by another state or who has received designation by the U.S. Armed Forces as a 12R electrician or equivalent shall be issued without examination as provided pursuant to this section on payment of the required fee.

Reciprocity. A master’s or journeyman’s license, as the case may be, shall be issued to a person to whom a master electrician’s license or a journeyman electrician’s license has been previously issued by another state, whose standards are equivalent to those of this State, if under the laws or regulations of the state issuing the license a similar privilege is granted to electricians licensed under the laws of this State.
(b) (1) Reciprocity. A master’s or journeyman’s license, as the case may be, shall be issued to a person to whom a master electrician’s license or a journeyman electrician’s license has been previously issued by another state, whose standards are equivalent to those of this State, if under the laws or regulations of the state issuing the license a similar privilege is granted to electricians licensed under the laws of this State.

Uniform process for endorsement from other states.

The Board shall issue a license to master and journeyman electricians who have been licensed in good standing in another jurisdiction within the United States for at least three years, regardless of whether that jurisdiction meets the reciprocity requirements of subdivision (1) of this subsection.

If the Board determines that three years of demonstrated practice in another specific jurisdiction is not adequately protective of the public, it shall provide its rationale to the Commissioner, who may propose any necessary statutory or rule amendments in order to implement more restrictive requirements for endorsement for that jurisdiction.

The Commissioner may issue to an endorsement applicant a waiver of the practice requirement if there is a showing that the waiver follows State policy and the public is adequately protected.

Except as otherwise provided by law, a journeyman’s license shall be issued to a service member or veteran who:

submits a complete application and any documentation required by the Board;

has received designation by the U.S. Armed Forces as a 12R electrician or equivalent; and

has completed a minimum of 8,000 hours and four years of active duty field work as a 12R electrician or equivalent.

As used in this section:

“Service member” means an individual who is an active member of:

the U.S. Armed Forces;

a reserve component of the U.S. Armed Forces;

the U.S. Coast Guard; or

the National Guard of any state.

“Veteran” means a former service member who received an honorable discharge or a general discharge under honorable conditions from active duty not more than two years prior to submitting an application for licensure.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 284

(Adj. Sess.), § 3; amended

1987, No. 274

(Adj. Sess.), § 17;

2017, No. 119

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2019, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 13, eff. April 1, 2021.

§ 907.
Recognition of experience.

The Board, in determining the qualifications of an applicant for a license, may in its discretion give recognition:

in the case of an application for a master’s license, to the applicant’s experience as a licensed journeyman in another state;

in the case of an application for a journeyman’s license, to an apprenticeship served in another state; or

to experience or prior qualifications.

The Board, in determining the qualifications of a service member or veteran, as defined pursuant to section 906 of this subchapter, who is applying for a master’s license, shall give recognition to the applicant’s:
(b) (1) The Board, in determining the qualifications of a service member or veteran, as defined pursuant to section 906 of this subchapter, who is applying for a master’s license, shall give recognition to the applicant’s:

experience as a 12R electrician or equivalent in the U.S. Armed Forces; and

other experience or prior qualifications.

The Board may evaluate specific military credentials to determine equivalency to credentials within the Board’s jurisdiction. The determinations shall be adopted through written policy that shall be posted on the Board’s website.

The Commissioner shall adopt rules in consultation with the Board that prescribe a process for the Commissioner to assess the equivalence of an applicant’s professional credentials earned outside the United States as compared to State licensing requirements for electricians.
(c) (1) The Commissioner shall adopt rules in consultation with the Board that prescribe a process for the Commissioner to assess the equivalence of an applicant’s professional credentials earned outside the United States as compared to State licensing requirements for electricians.

Any determination of equivalence by the Commissioner under this subsection shall be in consultation with the Board, recorded in the applicant’s licensing file, and binding upon the Board.

In administering this section, the Board may rely upon third-party credential verification services. The cost of such services shall be paid by the applicant.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 284

(Adj. Sess.), § 3; amended

1973, No. 146

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. March 11, 1974;

1987, No. 274

(Adj. Sess.), § 18;

2017, No. 119

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2019, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 14, eff. April 1, 2021.

§ 908.
Expiration and renewal of licenses; continuing education.

All licenses expire on the last day of a month designated by the Board. A license shall be valid for three years. The Board shall renew the license of a person holding a valid license issued under this chapter on receipt of an application for renewal and the required fee on or before the expiration date of his license, except as provided in section 892 of this title.

All journeyman and master electricians shall, as a condition of license renewal, complete 15 hours of instruction, approved by the Board, on the national electrical code during the preceding 36-month period. All holders of a type-S journeyman license shall, as a condition of renewal, complete eight hours of instruction, approved by the Board, on the subject of the license holder’s specialty during the preceding 36 months, except that holders of multiple type-S licenses shall not be required to complete more than 15 hours of instruction during the preceding 36 months.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 284

(Adj. Sess.), § 3; amended

1979, No. 121

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

1987, No. 274

(Adj. Sess.), § 19;

1991, No. 234

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

2001, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 44f, eff. June 27, 2002;

2003, No. 63

, § 77, eff. June 11, 2003.

§ 909.
Revocation, suspension, and refusing of renewal of license.

The Board, after notice to the licensee and opportunity for hearing, may revoke or suspend a license issued under this chapter, or refuse to renew the license of a person who has made application for renewal:

if the license was wrongfully or fraudulently obtained;

if the licensee has violated or failed to comply with any provision of this chapter, or any rule, regulation, or requirement adopted under this chapter;

if the licensee is found by the Board to be unqualified to hold the license.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 284

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 910.
License not required.

A license shall not be required for the following types of work:

Any electrical work, including construction, installation, operation, maintenance, and repair of electrical installations in, on, or about equipment or premises, that are owned or leased by the operator of any industrial or manufacturing plant, if the work is done under the supervision of an electrical engineer or master electrician in the employ of the operator.

Installation in laboratories of exposed electrical wiring for experimental purposes only.

Any electrical work by an owner or his or her regular employees in the owner’s freestanding single unit residence, in outbuildings accessory to such freestanding single unit residence, or any structure on owner-occupied farms.

Electrical installations performed as a part of a training project of a vocational school or other educational institution. However, the installation shall be inspected if the building in which the installation is made is to be used as a “complex structure”.

Electrical work performed by an electrician’s helper under the direct supervision of a person who holds an appropriate license issued under this chapter.

Any electrical work in a building used for dwelling or residential purposes that contains no more than two dwelling units.

Installation of solar electric modules and racking on complex structures to the point of connection to field-fabricated wiring and erection of net metered wind turbines.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 284

(Adj. Sess.), § 3; amended

1973, No. 146

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 11, 1974;

1987, No. 274

(Adj. Sess.), § 20;

2009, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 18d, eff. June 4, 2010.

§ 911.
Penalty.

Any person who installs, replaces, or repairs any electrical installation except as provided in sections 882 and 910 of this title, without first obtaining an appropriate license under this subchapter, or employs a person to make any electrical installation for which he or she is not properly licensed under this chapter, or procures any license wrongfully or by fraud, shall be fined not more than $500.00 for each offense.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 284

(Adj. Sess.), § 3; amended

1987, No. 274

(Adj. Sess.), § 21.

§ 912.
Repealed.
1987, No. 274 (Adj. Sess.), § 24.

§ 913.
License fees and licenses.

All licenses shall be issued by the Chair of the Board.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 284

(Adj. Sess.), § 3; amended

1975, No. 118

, § 77;

1999, No. 49

, § 144.

§ 914.
Members of Board; per diem and expenses.

Each appointed member of the Board is entitled to a per diem and expenses as provided in

32 V.S.A. § 1010

.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 284

(Adj. Sess.), § 3; amended

1987, No. 274

(Adj. Sess.), § 22.

§ 915.
Employment of inspectors; appropriation.

The Department of Public Safety is authorized to employ inspectors as necessary for carrying out the responsibilities of the Commissioner under section 893 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 284

(Adj. Sess.), § 3; amended

1979, No. 121

(Adj. Sess.), § 9;

1999, No. 49

, § 145;

2003, No. 141

(Adj. Sess.), § 10c, eff. April 1, 2005.